Utah statutes.
53-2a-505.   Privileges and immunities of law enforcement officers.

Any law enforcement officer of another state and the officer's employer are specifically entitled to the application of this part if the law enforcement officer is empowered to act under Section 19-701, Idaho Code, or an interstate mutual aid agreement.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

